Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 204.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âAttractive to childrenâ means the use 3 of any characters or symbols designed to appeal, or likely to 4 appeal, primarily to individuals under twenty-one years of age, 5 including but not limited to an anthropomorphized animal, a 6 creature, a promotional character, a licensed character, an 7 inanimate object, a depiction of a child, or a depiction of 8 candy. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 1B. a. âBeverageâ means a liquid that may 10 be consumed by a human or animal. 11 b. âBeverageâ does not include a consumable hemp product in 12 the form of a tincture. 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 1C. âChild resistant safeguardâ means a 14 final packaged form that complies with the United States Poison 15 Prevention Packaging Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. Â§14711 et seq., as 16 amended. 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 1D. âConsumable hemp establishmentâ 18 includes a consumable hemp manufacturer and consumable hemp 19 retailer. 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 1E. a. âConsumable hemp manufacturerâ 21 means a consumable hemp establishment engaged in manufacturing, 22 processing, packing, holding, preparing, distributing, or 23 selling a consumable hemp product on a wholesale basis. 24 b. âConsumable hemp manufacturerâ includes a person located 25 outside of this state who distributes a consumable hemp product 26 in this state. 27 c. âConsumable hemp manufacturerâ does not include a person 28 exclusively engaged in producing, harvesting, storing, or 29 distributing raw hemp. 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. âConsumable hemp product in the 31 form of a tinctureâ means a consumable hemp product that is in 32 a liquid state in which THC is suspended in a consumable base 33 oil. 34 b. âConsumable hemp product in the form of a tinctureâ does 35 -1- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 1/ 14 H.F. _____ not include a beverage. 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 2B. âConsumable hemp product in the form 2 of a topical applicationâ means a consumable hemp product in a 3 solid or liquid state that is a lotion, oil, transdermal patch, 4 or other manufactured form. 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 2C. a. âConsumable hemp retailerâ means a 6 consumable hemp establishment selling consumable hemp products 7 to consumers on a retail basis. 8 b. âConsumable hemp retailerâ includes an establishment 9 selling consumable hemp products on a retail basis on the 10 internet. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âFinal packaged formâ means the form or 12 packaging in which a consumable hemp product is intended for 13 individual retail sale. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. âIntellectual property infringementâ 15 means to infringe on any trade dress, trademark, branding, 16 mark, or other related right as described in 15 U.S.C. ch. 22, 17 or as described in chapter 548. 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 9B. âLabelâ means any display of written, 19 printed, or graphic matter printed on or affixed to a product 20 or package containing the product that provides information 21 regarding the product. 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. âMental health professionalâ means the 23 same as defined in section 228.1. 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 10B. a. âPackageâ means the immediate 25 container or wrapping in which a product is enclosed for 26 consumption, use, or storage by consumers of that product. 27 b. âPackageâ does not include any of the following: 28 (1) Any shipping container or wrapping used solely for 29 the transportation of any product in bulk or in a quantity 30 to manufacturers, packers, or processors, or to wholesale or 31 retail distributors. 32 (2) Any shipping container or outer wrapping used by 33 retailers to ship or deliver a product to consumers unless it 34 is the only such container or wrapping. 35 -2- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 2/ 14 H.F. _____ NEW SUBSECTION . 10C. âResemblance to a recognizable food 1 productâ means to bear a reasonable appearance to an existing 2 candy, snack, or other food product that is widely distributed 3 and familiar to the public. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. âServingâ means the portion of a 5 substance customarily consumed per dose. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. âSynthetic consumable hemp productâ 7 means an engineered product containing cannabinoids not 8 naturally occurring in hemp. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. âTHCâ means delta-9 10 tetrahydrocannabinol. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. âTotal THCâ means the same as defined 12 in 7 C.F.R. Â§990.1. 13 Sec. 2. Section 204.2, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 2. âConsumable hemp productâ means a hemp product that 16 includes a substance that is metabolized or is otherwise 17 subject to a biotransformative process when introduced into the 18 human body of a human or animal . 19 a. A consumable hemp product may be introduced into the 20 human body of a human or animal by ingestion or absorption by 21 any device including but not limited to an electronic device. 22 b. A consumable hemp product may exist in a solid or liquid 23 state and in any form . 24 c. A hemp product is deemed to be a consumable hemp product 25 if all of the following apply: 26 (1) It is any of the following: 27 (a) Designed by the processor, including the manufacturer, 28 to be introduced into the human body. 29 (b) Advertised as an item to be introduced into the human 30 body. 31 (c) Distributed, exported, imported, offered for sale, or 32 sold to be introduced into the human body. 33 (2) Its maximum total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration is 34 less than or equal to the lesser of the following: 35 -3- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 3/ 14 H.F. _____ (a) Three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis. 1 (b) Four milligrams per serving and ten milligrams per 2 container on a dry weight basis. 3 d. c. âConsumable hemp productâ includes but is not limited 4 to any of the following: 5 (1) A noncombustible form of hemp that may be digested, 6 such as food; internally absorbed , such as chew or snuff ; or 7 absorbed through the skin , such as a topical application . 8 (2) Hemp processed or otherwise manufactured, marketed, 9 sold, or distributed as food, a food additive, or a dietary 10 supplement , or a drug . 11 e. d. âConsumable hemp productâ does not include a hemp 12 product if the intended use of the hemp product is introduction 13 into the human body by any method of inhalation, as prohibited 14 under section 204.14A . 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 204.3 Department ââ administration and 16 rulemaking. 17 1. The department of health and human services shall 18 administer this chapter. 19 2. The department shall adopt rules under this chapter 20 only to the extent that the rules are necessary to effectively 21 comply with any of the following matters: 22 a. Administrative procedure, including methods to regularly 23 process registrations, conduct investigations, and make 24 decisions in compliance with chapter 17A. 25 b. The health and safety of the public. 26 (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (2), a rule 27 regulating a health and safety matter must cover a matter 28 expressly addressed in this chapter. 29 (2) A rule regulating a health and safety matter may cover a 30 matter that is implied in this chapter, if the rule is required 31 to comply with applicable federal law. 32 (3) A rule regulating a health and safety matter regulating 33 a health and safety matter must be supported by scientific 34 evidence. 35 -4- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 4/ 14 H.F. _____ 3. As part of giving notice of intended action, the 1 department shall afford interested persons not less than 2 sixty days to make written or oral presentations regarding 3 the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule, notwithstanding 4 section 17A.4, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . 5 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 204.4 Department ââ continuing 6 education programs. 7 1. The department of health and human services shall 8 establish and administer continuing education programs for 9 all departmental staff involved in the regulation of hemp 10 and hemp products, including matters relating to production, 11 transportation, manufacture, and distribution, including sale 12 on a wholesale or retail basis. The education program must 13 include current hemp industry standards and practices, the 14 best practices for effective and consistent enforcement of 15 laws regulating hemp products, and emerging research regarding 16 consumable hemp products. 17 2. A continuing education program must be conducted by 18 persons who have credentials in conducting hemp education or 19 training, including persons accredited by the hemp industry 20 association, the national hemp association, or the United 21 States department of agriculture. 22 3. The department shall annually review and update the 23 continuing education program to ensure the programâs ongoing 24 relevance and effectiveness. 25 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 204.5 Department ââ public outreach 26 programs. 27 The department of health and human services, in cooperation 28 with the department of agriculture and land stewardship 29 under chapter 204A, shall establish and administer continuing 30 public outreach programs regarding the regulation of hemp 31 and hemp products, including matters relating to production, 32 transportation, manufacture, and distribution, including sale 33 on a wholesale or retail basis. 34 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 204.6 Department ââ annual state hemp 35 -5- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 5/ 14 H.F. _____ report. 1 1. The department of health and human services, in 2 cooperation with the department of agriculture and land 3 stewardship under chapter 204A, and the department of revenue, 4 shall prepare and submit an annual state hemp report to the 5 governor and general assembly. 6 2. The annual state hemp report must include a summary of 7 all of the following: 8 a. To the extent it can be determined, the status of hemp 9 production under chapter 204A, including all of the following: 10 (1) The number of applications received and approved or not 11 approved for licenses issued to persons seeking to produce hemp 12 in this state by the United States department of agriculture 13 under the federal hemp law. 14 (2) The number of years that licensees have produced hemp 15 in this state. 16 (3) The number of acres used to produce hemp in this state 17 and this stateâs ranking among all states. 18 (4) The total revenue generated from the production and sale 19 of hemp in this state. 20 (5) The total property taxes paid on land used to produce 21 hemp. 22 (6) The number and type of enforcement actions taken by the 23 state against growers and transporters of hemp. 24 b. To the extent it can be determined, the status of hemp 25 product manufacturing and distribution, including sales on a 26 wholesale and retail basis, including all of the following: 27 (1) The number of applications received and approved or 28 not approved as registrants by the department of health and 29 human services, including applications to be consumable hemp 30 manufacturers and consumable hemp retailers. 31 (2) The number of years that registrants have been 32 in business in this state, including as consumable hemp 33 manufacturers and consumable hemp retailers. 34 (3) Efforts that the department of health and human services 35 -6- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 6/ 14 H.F. _____ has taken or plans to take to cooperate with other states 1 regulating hemp products. 2 (4) The total revenue generated by registrants, including 3 as consumable hemp manufacturers and consumable hemp retailers. 4 The report must indicate this stateâs ranking among all states. 5 (5) The total state revenue collected in fees and taxes 6 contributed by consumable hemp manufacturers and consumable 7 hemp retailers. 8 (6) The number of jobs created by consumable hemp 9 manufacturers and consumable hemp retailers. 10 (7) The number and type of enforcement actions taken by the 11 state against consumable hemp manufacturers and consumable hemp 12 retailers. 13 (8) Continuing education programs under section 204.4. 14 (9) Public outreach programs under section 204.5. 15 (10) The type of rules that the department of health and 16 human services proposes to adopt in the next twelve months. 17 3. The department of health and human services shall deliver 18 the annual report to the governor and general assembly not 19 later than January 15 of each year. 20 Sec. 7. Section 204.7, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2025, 21 is amended to read as follows: 22 c. The consumable hemp product complies with packaging and 23 labeling requirements , which shall be established by rules 24 adopted by the department of health and human services. Each 25 container storing a consumable hemp product shall be affixed 26 with a notice advising consumers regarding the risks associated 27 with its use provided in this chapter . The department of 28 health and human services shall adopt rules regarding the 29 language of the notice and its display on the container. 30 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 204.7A Hemp product deemed to be 31 consumable hemp product. 32 A hemp product is deemed to be a consumable hemp product if 33 all of the following apply: 34 1. It is any of the following: 35 -7- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 7/ 14 H.F. _____ a. Designed by the processor, including the manufacturer, to 1 be introduced into the body of a human or animal. 2 b. Advertised as an item to be introduced into the body of 3 a human or animal. 4 c. Distributed, exported, imported, offered for sale, or 5 sold to be introduced into the body of a human or animal. 6 2. Its maximum total THC concentration is less than or equal 7 to the lesser of the following: 8 a. Three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis. 9 b. Five milligrams per serving on a dry weight basis. 10 Sec. 9. Section 204.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 204.8 Hemp ââ testing requirements and certificate of 13 analysis. 14 1. For purposes of this chapter , requirements for testing 15 hemp and the issuance of a certificate of analysis for hemp are 16 governed by chapter 204A . 17 2. A valid certificate of analysis issued pursuant to 18 chapter 204A may be required to be held by a consumable hemp 19 establishment for the shelf life of the consumable hemp product 20 covered by the certificate of analysis. 21 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 204.9 Consumable hemp products ââ 22 total THC concentrations per form. 23 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, a consumable hemp 24 product shall not exceed a maximum total THC per form as 25 follows: 26 a. A consumable hemp product in the form of a tincture, 27 three milligrams per one milliliter. 28 b. A beverage, ten milligrams per twelve fluid ounces or the 29 proportionate equivalent of a beverage. 30 c. A consumable hemp product in the form of a topical 31 application, one thousand milligrams per package. 32 2. A consumable hemp product shall not exceed ten milligrams 33 if manufactured in this state for distribution outside this 34 state. 35 -8- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 8/ 14 H.F. _____ Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 204.10 Consumable hemp products ââ 1 packaging requirements. 2 1. A person preparing a consumable hemp product in its final 3 package form shall do all of the following: 4 a. Provide for safety requirements as follows: 5 (1) Protect the packaged consumable hemp product from 6 contamination from or exposure to any toxic or harmful 7 substance. 8 (2) Include a child resistant safeguard to reduce the risk 9 of poisoning in children. 10 (3) Use resealable units to separate more than one serving 11 of a consumable hemp product. 12 (4) If the packaging includes a consumable hemp product 13 manufactured in the form of a tincture, include a calibrated 14 dropper or similar device for measuring a single serving. 15 (5) Include on a packing label a conspicuous statement 16 indicating the consumable hemp productâs ratio of THC to 17 cannabidiol. 18 b. Not include more than a thirty-day supply of a consumable 19 hemp product for human or animal consumption. 20 2. A person preparing a consumable hemp product in its final 21 package form shall not do any of the following: 22 a. Mislead potential or actual consumers regarding the 23 contents of the package. 24 b. Engage in deceptive advertising as provided in section 25 204.11. 26 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 204.11 Consumable hemp products ââ 27 advertising. 28 A person shall not engage in the deceptive advertising of a 29 consumable hemp product, including but not limited to any of 30 the following: 31 1. Stating or suggesting a consumable hemp product 32 constitutes or contains medical cannabidiol regulated under 33 chapter 124E, or any substance commonly known as medical 34 marijuana or medical cannabis. 35 -9- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 9/ 14 H.F. _____ 2. Engage in intellectual property infringement. 1 3. Present the consumable hemp product in a manner that is 2 any of the following: 3 a. Bears a resemblance to a recognizable food product. 4 b. Is attractive to children. 5 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 204.11A Consumable hemp establishment 6 ââ locations. 7 1. The department may require separate registrations for 8 a person doing business as different types of consumable hemp 9 establishments or at different locations. 10 2. The department shall allow a person to engage in the 11 retail sale of consumable hemp products as part of the same 12 consumable hemp establishment doing business at two locations 13 under the same registration, if all of the following apply: 14 a. The person has been engaged in the retail sale of 15 consumable hemp products at the first location for at least two 16 years without violating this chapter. 17 b. The person maintains the first location as the principal 18 place of business. 19 c. The person maintains the second location on a temporary 20 or mobile basis. 21 Sec. 14. Section 204.14A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 3. A person required to be registered to manufacture or 24 sell a consumable hemp product under section 204.7 shall not 25 manufacture, produce, distribute, market, or sell a synthetic 26 consumable hemp product , as defined by rules adopted by the 27 department of health and human services . 28 Sec. 15. Section 204.14E, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 1. A person under twenty-one years of age shall not consume, 31 possess, purchase, or attempt to purchase a consumable hemp 32 product , unless such action is approved by a mental health 33 professional . 34 Sec. 16. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. 35 -10- LSB 2611YC (5) 91 da/ns 10/ 14 H.F. _____ 1. The Code editor is directed to transfer section 204.17, 1 Code 2025, to section 204.6A. 2 2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the 3 Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the 4 enactment of this section. 5